Washington statutes.
RCW 26.33.385

Standards for locating records and information—Rules.

The department shall adopt rules, in consultation with affected parties, establishing minimum standards for making reasonable efforts to locate records and information relating to adoptions as required under RCW 26.33.350 and 26.33.380.

[ 1994 c 170 s 3.]